src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
nuori:nuore a_12 ;
pieni:piene a_12 ;
uusi:uute a_12_si ; !!= * @CODE@
täysi:täyte a_12_si ;
tyven:tyven a_22 ; !!= * @CODE@
tinatyven:tina#tyven a_22 ;
vasen:vase a_22_ma ; !!= * @CODE@
makkee:makke a_31_ee ; ! TODO TODO TODO check these, valkkee etc. confusion
auttii:autt2ii a_31_ii ; !!= * @CODE@
irtain:irt2ai vanha_a_32m ;
avvoin:avvoi vanha_a_32m ;
auttiin:auttii vanha_a_32m ;
likkiin:likkii vanha_a_32m ;
likkiin+Err/Orth:likhii vanha_a_32m ;
ilakka a_21_oi;
käsipuoli:käsi#puole a_12 ;
silmäpuoli:silmä#puole a_12 ;
liehmuu a_31_uu  ;
puoli:puole a_12 ;
suuri:suure a_12 ;
binääri:binääri a_21_odd_i ;
horisontaali:horisontaali a_21_odd_i ;
globaali:globaali a_21_odd_i ;
tupultti:tupultti a_21_odd_i ;
nöitraali:nöitraali a_21_odd_i ;
eksterni:eksterni a_21_odd_i ;
turkiisi:turkiisi a_21_odd_i ;
ovaali:ovaali a_21_odd_i ;
heterofiili:heterofiili a_21_odd_i ;
tradisunelli:tradisunelli a_21_odd_i ;
aukipää:auki#pää a_31 ;
tihhee:tihhe a_31_ee ;
nuoppee:nuoppe a_31_ee ;
oikkee:oikke a_31_ee ;
vitivalkkee:vitivalkke a_31_ee ;
julkkee:julkke a_31_ee ;
huokkee:huokke a_31_ee ;
tärkkee:tärkke a_31_ee ;
sitkee:sitke a_31_ee ;
vaalee:vaale a_31_ee ;
himmee:himme a_31_ee ;
säkkipimmee:säkkipimme a_31_ee ;
lieppee:lieppe a_31_ee ;
murree:murre a_31_ee ;
vällee:välle a_31_ee ;
ussee:us a_31_ussee ;
hirvee:hirve a_31_ee ;
hapan:happa a_22_ma ;
vasen:vase a_22_ma ;
lämmin:lämpi a_22_ma ;
enempi:ene a_parempi ;
kauheempi:kauhee a_parempi ;
kaunhiimpi:kaunhii a_parempi ;
kummalisempi:kummalise a_parempi ;
tähđelisempi:tähđelise a_parempi ;
tervheempi:tervhee a_parempi ;
kuumempi:kuume a_parempi ;
likempi:like a_parempi ;
hirveempi:hirvee a_parempi ;
hullumpi:hullu a_parempi ;
muutheempi:muuthee a_parempi ;
notkeempi:notkee a_parempi ;
pitempi:pite a_parempi ;
suurempi:suure a_parempi ;
vahvempi:vahve a_parempi ;
värrempi:värre a_parempi ;
arvokkhaampi:arvokkhaa a_arvokkhaampi_even ;
iloisempi:iloise a_parempi_even ;
perustheelisempi:perustheelise a_parempi_even ;
sinisempi:sinise a_parempi_even ;
vakavampi:vakava a_parempi_even ;
vaattiivampi:vaattiiva a_parempi_even ;
alhaisempi:alhaise a_parempi_even ;
matalampi:matala a_parempi_even ;
etelämpi:etelä a_parempi_even ;
rekiunaali a_21_odd_i ;
passeli a_21_odd_i ;
polaari:polaari a_21_odd_i ;
primääri a_21_odd_i ;
turkkiisi:turkkiisi a_21_odd_i ;
uniikki:uniikki a_21_odd_i ;
anonyymiseerattu:anonyymiseerattu a_21_odd_u ;
kotileivottu:koti#leivottu a_21_odd_u ;
lakihuuđettu:lakihuuđettu a_21_odd_u ;
pilhaanajettu:pilhaan#ajettu a_21_odd_u ;
siđottu:siđottu a_21_odd_u ;
detaljeerattu:detaljeerattu a_21_odd_u ;
punalistattu:puna#listattu a_21_odd_u ;
rajattu:rajattu a_21_odd_u ;
uhrittu:uhrittu a_21_odd_u ;
kovottu:kovottu a_21_odd_u ;
viimestimainittu:viimesti#mainittu a_21_odd_u ;
ittedesignattu:itte#designattu a_21_even_u ;
matrikuleerattu:matrikuleerattu a_21_even_u ;
opetettu a_21_even_u ;
rajoitettu+Err/Orth:rajotettu a_21_even_u ;
ylössuijutettu:ylös#suijutettu a_21_even_u ;
debateerattu:debateerattu a_21_odd_u ;
vasittu a_21_odd_u ;
mettäpeitetty:mettä#peitetty a_21_odd_u ;
kristitty a_21_odd_u ;
silkkipräntätty:silkki#präntätty a_21_odd_u  ;
ođotettu+Err/Orth:ootettu a_21_even_u ;
vasta-asetettu:vasta-#asetettu a_21_even_u ;
sishäänrakenettu:sishään#rakenettu a_21_even_u ;
rauhoitettu:rauhoitettu a_21_even_u ;
pyhitetty a_21_even_u ;
lämmitetty:lämmitetty a_21_even_u ;
ankkuroitu:ankkuroitu a_21_even_u ;
koristeltu:koristeltu a_21_even_u ;
menetetty:menetetty a_21_even_u ;
hyväksytty:hyväksytty a_21_even_u ;
soviteltu:soviteltu a_21_even_u ;
veistetty:veistetty a_21_odd_u ;
ytelä a_21_odd_ae ;
äitelä a_21_odd_ae ;
näppärä a_21_odd_ae ;
rehevä:rehevä a_21_odd_ae ;
tekkeevä:tekkeevä a_21_odd_ae ;
näkkyyvä:näkkyyvä a_21_odd_ae ;
kielttäävä:kielttäävä a_21_odd_ae ;
rienttäävä:rienttäävä a_21_odd_ae ;
syđäntäsärkkeevä:syđäntä#särkkeevä a_21_odd_ae ;
terräävä:terräävä a_21_odd_ae ;
yhtheenvettäävä:yhtheen#vettäävä a_21_odd_ae ;
väkkeevä a_21_odd_ae ;
ikävä a_21_odd_ae ;
syötävä a_21_odd_ae ;
kiilttäävä a_21_odd_ae ;
ymmärettävä:ymmärettävä a_21_odd_ae ;
korkea a_31_ea;
ruskea a_31_ea ;
sakea a_31_ea ;
puolitäysi:puoli#täyte a_12_si ;
tampuntäysi:tampun#täyte a_12_si ;
täppitäysi:täppi#täyte a_12_si ;
tosi:tote a_12_si ;
